Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-103, as
amended by Section 40, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 6-103), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-103. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, Service
Oklahoma shall not issue a driver license to:
1. Any person who is under eighteen (18) years of age, except
that Service Oklahoma may issue a Class D license to any person who
attains sixteen (16) years of age on or after August 15, 2000, and
meets the requirements of Sections Section 6-105 and 6-107.3 of this
title;
2. Any unemancipated person who is under eighteen (18) years of
age and whose custodial legal parent or legal guardian does not
approve the issuance of a license as required by Section 6-110.2 of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

this title or objects to the issuance of a license or permit by
filing an objection pursuant to Section 6-103.1 of this title;
3. Any person whose driving privilege has been suspended,
revoked, canceled, or denied in this state or any other state or
country until the driving privilege has been reinstated by the state
or country withdrawing the privilege;
4. Any person who is classified as an excessive user of
alcohol, any other intoxicating substance, or a combination of
alcohol and any other intoxicating substance, and inimical to public
safety, in accordance with rules promulgated by the Department
Service Oklahoma, until all requirements granting or reinstating
driving privileges are met, including, but not limited to,
abstinence from the use of alcohol, any other intoxicating
substance, or any combination of alcohol and any other intoxicating
substance for a minimum of either twelve (12) months or eighteen
(18) months, as determined by OAC 595:10-5 670:15-11-11, immediately
preceding application for or application for reinstatement of
driving privileges;
5. Any person who is required by Section 6-101 et seq. of this
title to take an examination, unless the person shall have
successfully passed the examination;
6. Any person who is required under the laws of this state to
deposit proof of financial responsibility and who has not deposited
such proof;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. Any person who is physically deformed or who is afflicted
with any mental disease or physical condition that would impair the
driving ability of the person or when the Commissioner of Public
Safety, from information concerning the person or from the records
and reports on file in the Department of Public Safety, determines
that the operation of a motor vehicle by such person on the highways
would be inimical to public safety or welfare;
8. Any person who is a nonresident, as defined in Section 1-137
of this title;
9. Any alien noncitizen, unless such person presents valid
documentation of identity and authorization for presence in the
United States issued pursuant to the laws of the United States;
provided, no license shall be issued to any alien noncitizen whose
documentation indicates the alien noncitizen is a visitor or is not
eligible to establish residency; or
10. Any person who possesses a valid license to operate a motor
vehicle issued by another state until the other state license has
been surrendered.
B. Any applicant who is denied a license under the provisions
of subsection A of this section shall have the right to an appeal as
provided in Section 6-211 of this title.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-106, as
last amended by Section 5, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-106), is amended to read as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 6-106. A. 1. Every application for a driver license
or identification card shall be made by the applicant upon a form
furnished by Service Oklahoma.
2. Every original, renewal, or replacement application for a
driver license or identification card made by a male applicant who
is at least sixteen (16) but less than twenty-six (26) years of age
shall include a statement that by submitting the application, the
applicant is consenting to registration with the Selective Service
System. The pertinent information from the application shall be
forwarded by Service Oklahoma to the Data Management Center of the
Selective Service System in order to register the applicant as
required by law with the Selective Service System. Any applicant
refusing to sign the consent statement shall be denied a driver
license or identification card.
3. Except as provided for in subsections G and, H, and I of
this section, every applicant for a driver license or identification
card shall provide to Service Oklahoma at the time of application a
document showing proof of identity. Service Oklahoma shall
promulgate rules prescribing forms of identification acceptable for
an original Oklahoma driver license.
B. Every applicant for a driver license shall provide the
following information:
1. Full name;
2. Date of birth;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Sex;
4. Address of principal residence and county of such residence,
which shall be referenced on the REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card;, and proof of such principal residency, as
prescribed by rules promulgated by Service Oklahoma, documenting
provided address;
5. Current and complete mailing address to be maintained by
Service Oklahoma for the purpose of giving notice, if necessary, as
required by Section 2-116 of this title;
6. Medical information, as determined by the Department of
Public Safety, which shall assure Service Oklahoma that the person
is not prohibited from being licensed as provided by paragraph 7 of
subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title;
7. Whether the applicant is deaf or hard-of-hearing;
8. A brief description of the applicant, as determined by the
Department;
9. Whether the applicant has previously been licensed, and, if
so, when and by what state or country, and whether any license has
ever been suspended or revoked, or whether an application has ever
been refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension,
revocation, or refusal;
10. Whether the applicant is an alien a noncitizen eligible to
be considered for licensure and is not prohibited from licensure

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

purs uant to paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this
title;
11. Whether the applicant has:
a. previously been licensed and, if so, when and by what
state or country, and
b. held more than one license at the same time during the
immediately preceding ten (10) years; and
12. Social Security number.
No person shall request Service Oklahoma to use the Social Security
number of that person as the driver license number. Upon renewal or
replacement of any driver license issued after the effective date of
this act July 1, 2001, the licensee shall advise Service Oklahoma or
the licensed operator if the present driver license number of the
licensee is the Social Security number of the licensee. If the
driver license number is the Social Security number, Service
Oklahoma or the licensed operator shall change the driver license
number to a computer-generated alphanumeric identification.
C. 1. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B
of this section, every applicant for a commercial driver license who
is subject to the requirements of 49 C.F.R., Part 391, and is
applying for an original, renewal, or replacement license, and every
person who, upon or after May 8, 2012, is currently the holder of a
commercial driver license and is subject to the requirements of 49
C.F.R., Part 391, and who does not apply for a renewal or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

repl acement license prior to January 30, 2014, shall submit to
Service Oklahoma and maintain with Service Oklahoma a current
approved medical examination certificate signed by a licensed
physician authorized to perform and approve medical examination
certifications. Service Oklahoma shall adopt rules for maintaining
medical examination certificates pursuant to the requirements in 49
C.F.R., Parts 383 and 384. Any commercial driver licensee subject
to the requirements of this paragraph who fails to maintain on file
with Service Oklahoma a current, approved medical examination
certificate shall have the driving privileges of the person
downgraded to a Class D driver license by Service Oklahoma.
2. If the applicant is applying for an original commercial
driver license in Oklahoma or is transferring a commercial driver
license from another state to Oklahoma, Service Oklahoma shall
review the driving record of the applicant in other states for the
immediately preceding ten (10) years, unless the record review has
already been performed by Service Oklahoma. As a result of the
review, if it is determined by Service Oklahoma that the applicant
is subject to a period of disqualification as prescribed by Section
6-205.2 of this title which has not yet been imposed, Service
Oklahoma shall impose the period of disqualification and the
applicant shall serve the period of disqualification before a
commercial driver license is issued to the applicant; provided,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

noth ing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent the issuance
of a Class D driver license to the applicant.
3. If the applicant has or is applying for a hazardous material
endorsement, the applicant shall submit to a security threat
assessment performed by the Transportation Security Administration
of the Department of Homeland Security as required by and pursuant
to 49 C.F.R., Part 1572, which shall be used to determine whether
the applicant is eligible for the endorsement pursuant to federal
law and regulation.
4. Service Oklahoma shall notify each commercial driving school
of the passage of this section, and each commercial driving school
shall notify prospective students of its school of the hazardous
material endorsement requirement.
D. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B of
this section, every applicant shall be given an option on the
application for issuance of a driver license or identification card
or renewal pursuant to Section 6-115 of this title to provide an
emergency contact person. The emergency contact information
requested may include full name, address, and phone number. The
emergency contact information shall be maintained by Service
Oklahoma and shall be used by Service Oklahoma and law enforcement
for emergency purposes only. A person listed as an emergency
contact may request to be removed at any time. Any update to a
change of name, address, or phone number may be made by the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

appl icant listing the emergency contact person or by the person
listed as the emergency contact.
E. Whenever application is received from a person previously
licensed in another jurisdiction, Service Oklahoma shall request a
copy of the driving record from the other jurisdiction and,
effective September 1, 2005, from all other jurisdictions in which
the person was licensed within the immediately previous ten (10)
years. When received, the driving record shall become a part of the
driving record of the person in this state with the same force and
effect as though entered on the driver’s record in this state in the
original instance.
F. Whenever Service Oklahoma receives a request for a driving
record from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be
forwarded without charge.
G. A person shall not apply for or possess more than one state-
issued or territory-issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-101 of
this title. A valid and unexpired Oklahoma driver license shall
serve as both primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever
application for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card is
submitted to Service Oklahoma. The provisions of subsection B of
Section 1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not apply
when issuing an identification card pursuant to the provisions of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

this subsection. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.
H. A valid and unexpired U.S. passport shall serve as both
primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever application for a
driver license or identification card is submitted to the
Department. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.
I. As provided in Section 6-103 of this title, any applicant
who is a noncitizen shall present a valid proof of lawful presence,
which may serve as a primary proof of identity, whenever application
or renewal for a driver license or identification card is submitted
to the Department. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules
necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this
subsection.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-111.1 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. Any noncitizen applying for an original, renewal, or
replacement REAL ID Compliant Driver License or Identification Card
shall be issued a license or card bearing the words “Limited Term”.
2. On or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, Service
Oklahoma shall electronically report to the Governor, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Repr esentatives the number of licenses or cards bearing the words
“Limited Term” that have been issued in this state.
B. 1. Any noncitizen applying for an original, renewal, or
replacement REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or Identification
Card shall be issued a license or card bearing the words “Federal
Limits Apply”.
2. On or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, Service
Oklahoma shall electronically report to the Governor, the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives the number of licenses or cards bearing the words
“Federal Limits Apply” that have been issued in this state.
C. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement and administer the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-114, as
last amended by Section 4, Chapter 171, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-114), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-114. A. 1. In the event that a driver license is
lost, destroyed, or requires the updating of any information,
restriction, or endorsement displayed thereon, the person to whom
such license was issued may obtain a replacement thereof pursuant to
the provisions of subsection G of Section 6-101 of this title, and
upon payment of the required fee. If the person is an alien a
noncitizen, the person shall appear before Service Oklahoma or a
licensed operator and, after furnishing proof of identity as
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

requ ired in this section, shall be issued a replacement driver
license for a period which that does not exceed the lesser of:
a. the expiration date of the license being replaced, or
b. the expiration date on the valid documentation
authorizing the presence of the person in the United
States, as required by paragraph 9 of subsection A of
Section 6-103 of this title.
2. The cost of a replacement license shall be Twenty-five
Dollars ($25.00), which shall be apportioned and credited by Service
Oklahoma as follows:
a. Two Dollars ($2.00) shall be apportioned as provided
in Section 1104 of this title,
b. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be credited to the General
Revenue Fund of the State Treasury,
c. Five Dollars ($5.00) shall be credited to the
Department of Public Safety Computer Imaging System
Revolving Fund to be used solely for the purpose of
administering and maintaining the computer imaging
system of the Department through October 31, 2022.
Beginning November 1, 2022, Five Dollars ($5.00) shall
be credited to the Service Oklahoma Computer Imaging
System Revolving Fund to be used solely for the
purpose of administering and maintaining the computer
imaging system of Service Oklahoma,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d. Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be credited to the
Revolving Fund of the Department of Public Safety
Revolving Fund through October 31, 2022. Beginning
November 1, 2022, the Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be
credited to the Service Oklahoma Revolving Fund,
e. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be credited to the State
Public Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this
title, and
f. (1) Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this
paragraph related to the replacement of a driver
license by a licensed operator that does not
process approved applications or renewals for
REAL ID Compliant Driver Licenses or
Identification Cards shall be credited, in
addition to the amount authorized by subparagraph
e of this paragraph, to the State Public Safety
Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title, or
(2) Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this
paragraph related to the replacement of a driver
license by a licensed operator that does process
approved applications or renewals for REAL ID
Compliant Driver Licenses or Identification Cards
shall be retained by the licensed operator
through June 30, 2023. Beginning July 1, 2023,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

these monies shall be retained by the licensed
operator pursuant to subsection E of Section
1141.1 of this title.
3. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules prescribing forms of
primary and secondary identification acceptable for replacement of
an Oklahoma driver license; provided, however, a valid and unexpired
U.S. passport shall be acceptable as both primary and secondary
identification.
B. Any person desiring to add or remove an endorsement or
endorsements or a restriction or restrictions to any existing driver
license, when authorized by Service Oklahoma, shall obtain a
replacement license with the endorsement or endorsements or the
restriction or restrictions change thereon and shall be charged the
fee for a replacement license as provided in subsection A of this
section.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-115, as
last amended by Section 6, Chapter 330, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-115), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-115. A. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, every driver license shall be issued for a period of either
four (4) years or eight (8) years; provided, if the applicant or
licensee is an alien a noncitizen, the license shall be issued for a
period which that does not exceed the lesser of:
1. Four (4) years or eight (8) years; or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. The expiration date on the valid documentation authorizing
the presence of the applicant or licensee in the United States, as
required by paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this
title.
B. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the expiration
date of an initial license shall be no more than either four (4)
years or eight (8) years from the last day of the month of issuance
or no more than either four (4) years or eight (8) years from the
last day of the birth month of the applicant immediately preceding
the date of issuance, if requested by the applicant.
C. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the expiration
date of a renewal license shall be:
1. For a renewal during the month of expiration, either four
(4) years or eight (8) years from the last day of the month of
expiration of the expiring license or either four (4) years or eight
(8) years from the last day of the birth month of the licensee
immediately preceding the expiration date of the expiring license,
if requested by the licensee; or
2. For a renewal prior to the month of expiration, as provided
by rule of Service Oklahoma, either four (4) years or eight (8)
years from the last day of the month of expiration of the current
license; provided, no license shall be issued with an expiration
date of more than five (5) years from the date of renewal on a four

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(4) year four-year license or nine (9) years from the date of
renewal on an eight (8) year eight-year license.
D. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E of Section
1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any Oklahoma driver
license that is not more than three (3) years past the date of
expiration provided on the driver license shall be presumed to be a
valid form of identification for the purposes of renewing an
Oklahoma driver license.
E. Except as otherwise provided in this section, every driver
license shall be renewable by the licensee upon application to
either Service Oklahoma or a licensed operator, by furnishing the
current mailing address of the person and payment of the required
fee, if the person is otherwise eligible for renewal. If the
licensee is an alien a noncitizen, the licensee shall appear before
a driver license examiner of Service Oklahoma and shall be issued a
renewal driver license for a period which that does not exceed the
lesser of:
1. Four (4) years or eight (8) years; or
2. The expiration date on the valid documentation authorizing
the presence of the applicant or licensee in the United States, as
required by paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this
title.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. All applicants for renewals of driver licenses who have
proven collision records or apparent physical defects may be
required to take an examination as specified by Service Oklahoma.
G. When a person makes application for a driver license, or
makes application to renew a driver license, and the person has been
convicted of, or received a deferred judgment for, any offense
required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act,
the driver license shall be valid for a period of one (1) year from
the month of issuance, but may be renewed yearly during the time the
person is registered on the Sex Offender Registry. Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, the cost for such license shall be the
same as for other driver licenses and renewals.
H. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules prescribing forms of
identification acceptable for the renewal of an Oklahoma driver
license.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 23, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2010 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)